District of Columbia statutes.
39-306

Cooperation of District government.

(a)

The District of Columbia government may assist the Museum in carrying out this chapter by transferring or loaning to the Museum any District-owned real or personal property, facilities, furnishings, works of art, or historical artifacts. If the District of Columbia government transfers or loans any property to the Museum, the Museum may not transfer that property to any other person or entity without the express approval of the District government.

(b)

The District of Columbia government may appropriate funds or loan personnel to the Museum on a permanent or temporary basis to assist the Museum in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

July 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-79, § 7, 27 DCR 2546
1981 Ed., § 31-2106.